Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.892, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Roster of arbitrators. The commissioner, in consultation with community and law enforcement stakeholders, shall appoint a roster of six persons suited and qualified by training and experience to act as arbitrators for peace officer grievance arbitrations under this section. In making these appointments, and as applicable, the commissioner may consider the factors set forth in Minnesota Rules, parts 5530.0600 and 5530.0700, subpart 6, as well as a candidate's familiarity with labor law, the grievance process, and the law enforcement profession; or experience and training in cultural competency, racism, implicit bias, and recognizing and valuing community diversity and cultural differences. The appointments are effective immediately upon filing with the secretary of state. deleted text begin Arbitrators on the roster created by this subdivision shall not serve as an arbitrator in a labor arbitration other than a grievance arbitration as defined in this section.deleted text end